Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2595.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 204C.09, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Counting and initialing. (a) Before the voting begins, at least two election judges must certify the number of ballots delivered to the precinct. Election judges may conduct this count, presuming that the total count provided for prepackaged ballots is correct. As each package is opened, two judges must count the ballots in the package to ensure that the total count provided for the package is correct. Any discrepancy must be noted on the incident log. (b) Before the voting begins, or as soon as possible after it begins, at least two election judges shall each initial deleted text begin the backs ofdeleted text end all the ballots. The election judges shall not otherwise mark the ballots.